Tennessee, session 114, HB0784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of infant
formula and diapers and wipes designed to be used by infants and children.
(b) As used in this section, "infant formula" means a liquid or powder that
purports or is represented to be for special dietary use solely as a food for infants and
children by nature of its simulation of human milk or its suitability as a complete or partial
substitute for human milk.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0784
001583
- 1 -